Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2147.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 17, chapter 3, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 17-321, to read: START_STATUTE17-321. Private lands; taking deer; landowner permits A. The department shall issue a landowner permit for the taking of deer on private lands. B. The department shall issue a landowner permit if the commission determines that the permit is necessary FOR wildlife population management or to reduce conflicts between humans and wildlife or BETWEEN property and wildlife. C. A person may not transfer a landowner permit to any other person. END_STATUTE